California statutes. Public Contract Code
 awarding entity of a city, county, city and county, including charter cities and charter counties, district, special district, public authority, political subdivision, public corporation, or nonprofit transit corporation wholly owned by a public agency and formed to carry out the purposes of the public agency, from the original contractor, by the original contractor from any subcontractor, and by a subcontractor from any subcontractor thereunder, may exceed 5 percent on specific projects where the governing body of the public entity or designee, including, but not limited to, a general manager or other director of an appropriate department, has approved a finding, on a project by project basis, during a properly noticed and normally scheduled public hearing and prior to bid that the project is substantially complex and therefore requires a higher retention amount than 5 percent and the awarding entity includes in the bid documents details explaining the basis for the finding and the actual retention amount.
 In a contract between the original contractor and a subcontractor, and in a contract between a subcontractor and any subcontractor thereunder, the percentage of the retention proceeds withheld shall not exceed the percentage specified in the contract between the department and the original contractor.

(5) Any finding by a public entity that a project is substantially complex shall include a description of the specific project and why it is a unique project that is not regularly, customarily, or routinely performed by the agency or licensed contractors.

(c) A party identified in subdivision (a) shall not require any other party to waive any provision of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 121, Sec. 1.   (AB 2173)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

7202.

(a) The Department of Transportation is prohibited from withholding retention proceeds when making progress payments to a contractor for work performed on a transportation project.

(b) Nothing in this section shall alter, amend, or impair the rights, duties, and obligations of an original contractor, its subcontractors, and all subcontractors thereunder, relating to the construction of any public work of improvement as set forth in Section 7200.

(c) The
 Department of Transportation shall promptly notify the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature if the state’s best interests are compromised because retention was not withheld on a transportation project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 842, Sec. 1.   (SB 197)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7203.

(a) A public works contract entered into on or after January 1, 2016, that contains a clause that expressly requires a contractor to be responsible for delay damages is not enforceable unless the delay damages have been liquidated to a set amount and identified in the public works contract.

(b) “Delay damages” as used in this section, means damages incurred by the public agency for each day after the date on which the work was to be completed by the contractor pursuant to the public works contract. Delay damages shall not include damages incurred by a public agency after the filing of a notice of completion or, in the absence of a notice of completion, the acceptance
 by the public agency of the public work as complete. 

(c) “Public agency” shall include the state, the Regents of the University of California, a city, charter city, county, charter county, district, public authority, municipal utility, and any other political subdivision or public corporation of the state.

(d) This section shall not be construed to limit a right or remedy that the public agency has to enforce the express terms of the public works contract, except for a clause that expressly requires a contractor to be liable for delay damages.

(e) This section shall not be construed to preclude a public agency from including more than one clause for delay damages for specified portions of work when the delay damages have been liquidated
 to a set amount for each individual clause and identified in the public works contract.

(f) This section shall not apply to departments identified in Section 10106.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 434, Sec. 2.   (AB 552)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Claims and Disputes [9201. - 9204.]

9201.

(a) A public entity shall have full authority to compromise or otherwise settle any claim relating to a contract at any time.

(b) The public entity shall include provisions in a public works contract for timely notification of the contractor of the receipt of any third-party claim, relating to the contract.

(c) The public entity shall be entitled to recover its reasonable costs incurred in providing the
 notification required by subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 315, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

9203.

(a) Payment on any contract with a local agency for the creation, construction, alteration, repair, or improvement of any public structure, building, road, or other improvement, of any kind which will exceed in cost a total of five thousand dollars ($5,000), shall be made as the legislative body prescribes upon estimates approved by the legislative body, but progress payments shall not be made in excess of 95 percent of the percentage of actual work completed plus a like percentage of the value of material delivered on the ground or stored
 subject to, or under the control of, the local agency, and unused. The local agency shall withhold not less than 5 percent of the contract price until final completion and acceptance of the project. However, at any time after 50 percent of the work has been completed, if the legislative body finds that satisfactory progress is being made, it may make any of the remaining progress payments in full for actual work completed.

(b) Notwithstanding the dollar limit specified in subdivision (a), a county water authority shall be subject to a twenty-five thousand dollar ($25,000) limit for purposes of subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 126, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

9204.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that it is in the best interests of the state and its citizens to ensure that all construction business performed on a public works project in the state that is complete and not in dispute is paid in full and in a timely manner.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, including, but not limited to, Article 7.1 (commencing with Section 10240) of Chapter 1 of Part 2, Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 19100) of Part 2, and Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 20104) of Chapter 1 of Part 3, this section shall apply to any claim by a contractor in connection with a public works project.

(c) For
 purposes of this section:

(1) “Claim” means a separate demand by a contractor sent by registered mail or certified mail with return receipt requested, for one or more of the following:

(A) A time extension, including, without limitation, for relief from damages or penalties for delay assessed by a public entity under a contract for a public works project.

(B) Payment by the public entity of money or damages arising from work done by, or on behalf of, the contractor pursuant to the contract for a public works project and payment for which is not otherwise expressly provided or to which the claimant is not otherwise entitled.

(C) Payment of an amount that is
 disputed by the public entity.

(2) “Contractor” means any type of contractor within the meaning of Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code who has entered into a direct contract with a public entity for a public works project.

(3) (A) “Public entity” means, without limitation, except as provided in subparagraph (B), a state agency, department, office, division, bureau, board, or commission, the California State University, the University of California, a city, including a charter city, county, including a charter county, city and county, including a charter city and county, district, special district, public authority, political subdivision, public corporation, or nonprofit transit corporation wholly owned
 by a public agency and formed to carry out the purposes of the public agency.

(B) “Public entity” shall not include the following:

(i) The Department of Water Resources as to any project under the jurisdiction of that department.

(ii) The Department of Transportation as to any project under the jurisdiction of that department.

(iii) The Department of Parks and Recreation as to any project under the jurisdiction of that department.

(iv) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation with respect to any project under its jurisdiction pursuant to Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 7000) of Title 7 of Part 3 of
 the Penal Code.

(v) The Military Department as to any project under the jurisdiction of that department.

(vi) The Department of General Services as to all other projects.

(vii) The High-Speed Rail Authority.

(4) “Public works project” means the erection, construction, alteration, repair, or improvement of any public structure, building, road, or other public improvement of any kind.

(5) “Subcontractor” means any type of contractor within the meaning of Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code who either is in direct contract with a contractor or
 is a lower tier subcontractor.

(d) (1) (A) Upon receipt of a claim pursuant to this section, the public entity to which the claim applies shall conduct a reasonable review of the claim and, within a period not to exceed 45 days, shall provide the claimant a written statement identifying what portion of the claim is disputed and what portion is undisputed. Upon receipt of a claim, a public entity and a contractor may, by mutual agreement, extend the time period provided in this subdivision.

(B) The claimant shall furnish reasonable documentation to support the claim.

(C) If the public entity needs approval from its governing body to provide the claimant a written statement
 identifying the disputed portion and the undisputed portion of the claim, and the governing body does not meet within the 45 days or within the mutually agreed to extension of time following receipt of a claim sent by registered mail or certified mail, return receipt requested, the public entity shall have up to three days following the next duly publicly noticed meeting of the governing body after the 45-day period, or extension, expires to provide the claimant a written statement identifying the disputed portion and the undisputed portion.

(D) Any payment due on an undisputed portion of the claim shall be processed and made within 60 days after the public entity issues its written statement. If the public entity fails to issue a written statement, paragraph (3) shall apply.

(2) (A) If the claimant disputes the public entity’s written response, or if the public entity fails to respond to a claim issued pursuant to this section within the time prescribed, the claimant may demand in writing an informal conference to meet and confer for settlement of the issues in dispute. Upon receipt of a demand in writing sent by registered mail or certified mail, return receipt requested, the public entity shall schedule a meet and confer conference within 30 days for settlement of the dispute.

(B) Within 10 business days following the conclusion of the meet and confer conference, if the claim or any portion of the claim remains in dispute, the public entity shall provide the claimant a written statement identifying the portion of the claim that remains in dispute and the portion that is undisputed.
 Any payment due on an undisputed portion of the claim shall be processed and made within 60 days after the public entity issues its written statement. Any disputed portion of the claim, as identified by the contractor in writing, shall be submitted to nonbinding mediation, with the public entity and the claimant sharing the associated costs equally. The public entity and claimant shall mutually agree to a mediator within 10 business days after the disputed portion of the claim has been identified in writing. If the parties cannot agree upon a mediator, each party shall select a mediator and those mediators shall select a qualified neutral third party to mediate with regard to the disputed portion of the claim. Each party shall bear the fees and costs charged by its respective mediator in connection with the selection of the neutral mediator. If mediation is unsuccessful, the parts of the claim
 remaining in dispute shall be subject to applicable procedures outside this section.

(C) For purposes of this section, mediation includes any nonbinding process, including, but not limited to, neutral evaluation or a dispute review board, in which an independent third party or board assists the parties in dispute resolution through negotiation or by issuance of an evaluation. Any mediation utilized shall conform to the timeframes in this section.

(D) Unless otherwise agreed to by the public entity and the contractor in writing, the mediation conducted pursuant to this section shall excuse any further obligation under Section 20104.4 to mediate after litigation has been commenced.

(E) This section does not preclude a public
 entity from requiring arbitration of disputes under private arbitration or the Public Works Contract Arbitration Program, if mediation under this section does not resolve the parties’ dispute.

(3) Failure by the public entity to respond to a claim from a contractor within the time periods described in this subdivision or to otherwise meet the time requirements of this section shall result in the claim being deemed rejected in its entirety. A claim that is denied by reason of the public entity’s failure to have responded to a claim, or its failure to otherwise meet the time requirements of this section, shall not constitute an adverse finding with regard to the merits of the claim or the responsibility or qualifications of the claimant.

(4) Amounts not paid in a timely manner as
 required by this section shall bear interest at 7 percent per annum.

(5) If a subcontractor or a lower tier subcontractor lacks legal standing to assert a claim against a public entity because privity of contract does not exist, the contractor may present to the public entity a claim on behalf of a subcontractor or lower tier subcontractor. A subcontractor may request in writing, either on their own behalf or on behalf of a lower tier subcontractor, that the contractor present a claim for work which was performed by the subcontractor or by a lower tier subcontractor on behalf of the subcontractor. The subcontractor requesting that the claim be presented
 to the public entity shall furnish reasonable documentation to support the claim. Within 45 days of receipt of this written request, the contractor shall notify the subcontractor in writing as to whether the contractor presented the claim to the public entity and, if the original contractor did not present the claim, provide the subcontractor with a statement of the reasons for not having done so.

(e) The text of this section or a summary of it shall be set forth in the plans or specifications for any public works project that may give rise to a claim under this section.

(f) A waiver of the rights granted by this section is void and contrary to public policy, provided, however, that (1) upon receipt of a claim, the parties may mutually agree to waive, in writing, mediation
 and proceed directly to the commencement of a civil action or binding arbitration, as applicable; and (2) a public entity may prescribe reasonable change order, claim, and dispute resolution procedures and requirements in addition to the provisions of this section, so long as the contractual provisions do not conflict with or otherwise impair the timeframes and procedures set forth in this section.

(g) This section applies to contracts entered into on or after January 1, 2017.

(h) Nothing in this section shall impose liability upon a public entity that makes loans or grants available through a competitive application process, for the failure of an awardee to meet its contractual obligations.

(i) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute that is enacted before January 1, 2027, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 489, Sec. 1.   (AB 456)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. CONTRACTING BY STATE AGENCIES [10100. - 19150.]



  CHAPTER 1. State Contract Act [10100. - 10285.5.]



  ARTICLE 1. Scope of Chapter and General Provisions [10100. - 10111.2.]

10100.

This chapter may be cited as the State Contract Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 184.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

10101.

(a) Contracts for the purchase of supplies or materials, which are purchased pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10290), are not subject to this chapter, even though the seller is required to perform some incidental work or service in connection with the delivery of the material or supplies.

(b) Contracts for which emergency work
 or remedial measures are required are not subject to this chapter if the work or remedial measures are necessary to immediately avert, alleviate, repair, or mitigate destruction of property caused by the accidental or unplanned release of toxic substances and are necessary to protect the health, safety, and welfare of the general public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 185.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

10102.

Improvements on the property of the state on the waterfront of the City and County of San Francisco under the jurisdiction of the San Francisco Port Commission are not subject to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 186.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

10103.

Work done directly by any public utility company pursuant to order of the Public Utilities Commission or other public authority is not subject to this chapter, whether or not done under public supervision or paid for in whole or part out of public funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 187.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

10103.5.

Work performed by prisoners pursuant to an order by the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation or by the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority is not subject to this chapter, provided that the total cost of a project for the construction of new, previously unoccupied prison facilities or additions to an existing facility shall not exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) unless it is first approved by the State Public Works Board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 241, Sec. 64.   (SB 857)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10104.

As used in this chapter, “mobilization” includes preparatory work and operations, including, but not limited to, those necessary for the movement of personnel, equipment, supplies and incidentals to the project site, for the establishment of all offices, buildings and other facilities necessary for work on the project, and for all other work and operations which must be performed or costs incurred prior to beginning work on
 the various items on the project site.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 189.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

10105.

(a) As used in this chapter, “project” includes the erection, construction, alteration, repair, or improvement of any state structure, building, road, or other state improvement of any kind that will exceed a total cost calculated pursuant to subdivision (b).

(b) The total cost limit for calendar year 2010 shall be two hundred fifty
 thousand dollars ($250,000), and at two year intervals thereafter, the total cost limit shall be adjusted upward or downward by the Director of Finance to reflect the percentage change in the annual California Construction Index as used by the Department of General Services. The amount shall be rounded off to the nearest one-thousand-dollar ($1,000) figure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 190.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

10106.

For purposes of this chapter:

(a) “Department” means any of the following:

(1) The Department of Water Resources as to any project under the jurisdiction of that department.

(2) The Department of Transportation as to any project under the jurisdiction of that department.

(3) The Department of Parks and Recreation as to any project under the jurisdiction of that department.

(4) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation with respect to any project under its
 jurisdiction pursuant to Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 7000) of Title 7 of Part 3 of the Penal Code.

(5) The Military Department as to any project under the jurisdiction of that department.

(6) The High-Speed Rail Authority as to any project under the jurisdiction of that authority.

(7) The Department of General Services as to all other projects.

(b) “Director” means the director of each department as defined in this section respectively or the executive director, also known as the chief executive officer, in the case of the High-Speed Rail Authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 790, Sec. 8.   (SB 1172)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10107.

Whenever provision is made by law for any project that is not under the jurisdiction of the Department of Water Resources, the Department of Parks and Recreation, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation pursuant to Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 7000) of Title 7 of Part 3 of the Penal Code, the Department of Transportation, the High-Speed Rail Authority, or the Military Department, the project shall be under the sole charge and direct control of the Department of General Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 790, Sec. 9.   (SB 1172)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10108.

Where the nature of the work in the opinion of the department is such that its services in connection therewith are not required, it may authorize the carrying out of the project directly by the state agency concerned therewith if the estimated cost does not exceed six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000), except that the six hundred thousand dollar ($600,000) limitation shall not apply to a project of a district agricultural
 association or a project of the State Lands Commission. Any capital outlay project with a total value that does not exceed six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000) may be budgeted as a minor capital outlay project. This limit shall be adjusted pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 10105.

If the estimated total cost of any construction project or work carried out under this section exceeds twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), the district or agency shall solicit bids in writing and shall award the work to the lowest responsible bidder or reject all bids. However, the director may authorize the district or agency to carry out work in excess of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) under the provisions of this section by day labor if he or she deems that the award of a contract, the acceptance of bids, or the acceptance of further bids is not in the best interests of the state. In no event shall the amount of work performed by day labor under this section exceed
 the sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in the case of district agricultural association fair projects, or thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) in other cases.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 252, Sec. 3.   (AB 2181)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

10108.5.

(a) When the nature of the work by departments, boards, commissions, or conservancies within the Resources Agency, in the opinion of the Department of General Services, is such that its services in connection therewith are not required, it may authorize the carrying out of the project directly by the department within the Resources Agency concerned therewith if the estimated cost does not exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000). This limit shall be adjusted pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 10105.

 (b) If the estimated total cost of any construction project or work carried out under this section exceeds fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection shall solicit bids in writing and shall award the work to the lowest responsible bidder or reject all bids. However, the Director of General Services may authorize the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection to carry out work in excess of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) under this section by day labor if he or she deems that the award of a contract, the acceptance of bids, or the acceptance of further bids is not in the best interests of the state. However, in no event shall the amount of work performed by day labor under this section exceed the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000). This limit shall be adjusted pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 10105.

(c) Notwithstanding the cost
 limitation of subdivision (a), the State Coastal Conservancy may, if authorized by the Department of General Services as described in subdivision (a), directly carry out a public works project involving habitat or wetlands restoration and related pedestrian or cycling access improvements, not including buildings or other nonaccess related structures on the following state-owned lands: Bel Marin Keys Unit V in Marin County, Eden Landing Ecological Reserve (a part of the South Bay Salt Pond Restoration Project) in Alameda County, Bair Island Ecological Reserve in San Mateo County, Napa Sonoma Marshes State Wildlife Area in Napa, Solano, and Sonoma Counties, Ballona Wetlands Ecological Reserve in Los Angeles County, Buena Vista Lagoon Ecological Reserve in San Diego County, Los Peñasquitos Marsh in Torrey Pines State Natural Reserve in San Diego County, and Tijuana Estuary State Park in San Diego County. In carrying out a public works project pursuant to this subdivision, the State Coastal Conservancy shall
 comply with the provisions of, and regulations adopted pursuant to, this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 444, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

10108.6.

Notwithstanding Section 10108 and subdivision (a) of Section 10108.5, the department, upon request from the state agency concerned, may authorize the carrying out of a project or a class of projects of any amount directly by a state agency if the department finds that the state agency concerned is capable of successfully undertaking a project or projects of that amount. For projects or a class of projects where the total project cost exceeds three million dollars ($3,000,000), the department shall seek approval from the Department of Finance prior to authorizing a state agency to carry out the project or class of projects pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 997, Sec. 18.   (AB 179)   Effective September 30, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10108.7.

(a) The Department of Corrections shall provide in the general conditions under which bids will be received, that any person making a bid or offer to perform a contract shall, in his or her bid or offer, set forth the following information:

(1) The name and the location of the place of business of each subcontractor certified as a minority, women, or disabled veteran business enterprise who will perform work or labor or render service to the prime contractor in connection with
 the performance of the contract and who will be used by the prime contractor to fulfill minority, women, and disabled veteran business enterprise participation goals.

(2) The portion of work that will be done by each subcontractor under paragraph (1). The prime contractor shall list only one subcontractor for each portion of work as is defined by the prime contractor in his or her bid or offer.

(b) The Subletting and Subcontracting Fair Practices Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) of Part 1 shall apply to the information required by subdivision (a) relating to subcontractors certified as minority, women, or disabled veteran business enterprises.

(c) For purposes of this section, “subcontractor” and “prime contractor” shall have the same meaning as those terms are defined in Section 4113.

(d) As used in this section, “contract” does not include a contract negotiated pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 4525) of Division 5 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1032, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

10108.8.

The Department of Corrections, where feasible, shall enter into two or more procurement contracts for the purchase and development of the Business Information System (BIS) Project. The BIS project shall be developed to allow integration with other relevant statewide financial and personnel systems.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 227, Sec. 91.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10109.

Any notice inviting bids on a project which specifies locations of possible materials, such as a borrow pit or gravel bed, for use in the proposed project which would be subject to Section 1602 of the Fish and Game Code shall include any conditions or modifications established pursuant to Section 1603.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 383, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

10110.

(a) Where the nature of the work is historic restoration for the state park system, as determined jointly by the director and the Director of Parks and Recreation, the department may authorize the carrying out of the project directly by the Department of Parks and Recreation.

 (b) If the estimated total cost of any construction project or work carried out under this section exceeds fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), the Department of Parks and Recreation shall solicit bids in writing and award the work to the lowest responsible bidder or reject all bids. However, the director may authorize the Department of Parks and Recreation to carry out work in excess of fifty thousand dollars
 ($50,000) under the provisions of this section by day labor if the director determines, in consultation with the Director of Parks and Recreation, that the award of a contract, the acceptance of bids, or the acceptance of further bids is not in the best interests of the state. The Department of Parks and Recreation shall establish, by regulation, criteria to be considered by the Department of Parks and Recreation in requesting authorization from the director to perform all or part of a project by day labor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 573, Sec. 2.   (SB 204)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10111.

Commencing January 1, 2007, the department shall make available a report on contracting activity containing the following information:

(a) A listing of consulting services contracts that the state has entered into during the previous fiscal year. The listing shall include the following:

(1) The name and identification number of each contractor.

(2) The type of bidding entered into, the number of bidders, whether the low bidder was accepted, and if the low bidder was not accepted, an explanation of why another contractor was selected.

(3) The amount of the contract price.

(4) Whether the contract was a noncompetitive bid contract, and why the contract was a noncompetitive bid contract.

(5) Justification for entering into each consulting services contract.

(6) The purpose of the contract and the potential beneficiaries.

(7) The date when the initial contract was signed, and the date when the work began and was completed.

(b) The report shall also include a separate listing of consultant contracts completed during that fiscal year, with the same information specified in subdivision (a).

(c) The information specified in subdivisions (a) and (b) shall also include a list of any contracts underway during that fiscal year on which a change was made regarding the following:

(1) The completion date of the contract.

(2) The amount of money to be received by the contractor, if it exceeds 3 percent of the original contract price.

(3) The purpose of the contract or duties of the contractor. A brief explanation shall be given if the change in purpose is significant.

(d) The level of participation, by agency, of disabled veteran business enterprises in statewide contracting and shall include dollar values of contract award for the following
 categories:

(1) Construction.

(2) Architectural, engineering, and other professional services.

(3) Procurement of materials, supplies, and equipment.

(4) Information technology procurements.

Additionally, the report shall include a statistical summary detailing each awarding department’s goal achievement and a statewide total of those goals.

(e) The level of participation by small business in state contracting including:

(1) Upon request, an up-to-date list of eligible small business bidders
 by general procurement and construction contract categories, noting company names and addresses and also noting which small businesses also qualify as microbusinesses.

(2) By general procurement and construction contract categories, statistics comparing the small business and microbusiness contract participation dollars to the total state contract participation dollars.

(3) By awarding department and general procurement and construction categories, statistics comparing the small business and microbusiness contract participation dollars to the total state contract participation dollars.

(4) Any recommendations for changes in
 statutes or state policies to improve opportunities for small businesses and microbusinesses.

(5) A statistical summary of small businesses and microbusinesses certified for state contracting by the number of employees at the business for each of the following categories: 0–5, 26–50, 51–75, and 76–100.

(6) To the extent feasible, beginning in the year 2008, the number of contracts awarded by the department in the categories specified in paragraph (5).

(7) The number of contracts and dollar amounts awarded annually pursuant to Section 14838.5 of the Government Code to small businesses, microbusinesses, and disabled veteran business enterprises.

(f) The level of participation of business enterprises, by race, ethnicity, and gender of the owner,
 in contracts to the extent that the information has been voluntarily reported to the department. In addition, the report shall contain the levels of participation of business enterprises, by race, ethnicity, and gender of the owner, and whether the business is a lesbian, gay, bisexual, or transgender owned business for the following categories of contracts, to the extent that the information has been voluntarily reported to the department:

(1) Construction.

(2) Purchases of materials, supplies, or equipment.

(3) Professional services.

(g) In the years 2011 and 2012, any errors reported to the department by an awarding agency as required by Sections 10302, 10344, and 12104.5, in the previous fiscal year.

(h) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this
 subdivision shall apply on and after January 1, 2013.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 861, Sec. 1.   (AB 1960)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10111.2.

A department shall, upon request from a contractor plan room service, provide an electronic copy of a project’s contract documents at no charge to the contractor plan room.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 371, Sec. 1.   (AB 2036)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.1. Construction Manager/General Contractor Procurement Method for the Department of Water Resources [10112. - 10112.10.]

10112.

(a) This article provides for an alternative procurement procedure for certain projects performed by the Department of Water Resources.

(b) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this article to authorize the Department of Water Resources to utilize the Construction Manager/General Contractor method as a cost-effective option for constructing water resources projects.

(2) The Construction Manager/General Contractor method allows the department to engage a construction manager during the design process to provide input on the design. During the design phase, the construction
 manager provides advice including, but not limited to, scheduling, pricing, and phasing to assist the department to design a more constructible project.

(c) The Legislature finds and declares that utilizing a Construction Manager/General Contractor method requires a clear understanding of the roles and responsibilities of each participant in the process. The Legislature also finds and declares that cost-effective benefits are achieved by shifting the liability and risk for cost containment and project schedule to the construction manager and by permitting the coherent phasing of projects into discrete contract increments.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 247, Sec. 1.   (SB 626)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2033, pursuant to Section 10112.10.)
-------------------------------------------

10112.1.

As used in this article:

(a) “Construction manager” means a partnership, corporation, or other legal entity that is a licensed contractor pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code and that is able to provide appropriately licensed contracting and engineering services as needed pursuant to a Construction Manager/General Contractor method contract. 

(b) “Construction Manager/General Contractor method” means a project delivery method in which a construction manager is procured to provide preconstruction services during the design phase of the project and
 construction services during the construction phase of the project. The contract for construction services may be entered into at the same time as the contract for preconstruction services, or at a later time. The execution of the design and the construction of the project may be in sequential phases or concurrent phases. 

(c) “Department” means the Department of Water Resources.

(d) “Preconstruction services” means advice during the design phase including, but not limited to, scheduling, pricing, and phasing to assist the department to design a more constructible project. 

(e) “Project” means public works necessary for the construction, maintenance, or operation of elements of State Water Facilities, as defined in Section
 12934 of the Water Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 247, Sec. 1.   (SB 626)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2033, pursuant to Section 10112.10.)